Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1763
Indemnification.

A credit union may indemnify any or all of its officials and employees or former officials or employees against expenses actually and necessarily incurred by them in connection with the defense or settlement of any action, suit, or proceeding in which they, or any of them, are made a party or parties thereto by reason of being or having been an official or employee of the credit union. A credit union may not indemnify any or all of its officials and employees or former officials or employees against expenses actually and necessarily incurred by them in relation to matters as to which any such official or employee shall be adjudged in such action, suit, or proceeding to be liable for willful misconduct in the performance of duty and to such matters as are settled by agreement predicated on the existence of such liability.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 63.